New York, session 2025-2026, A11393.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of section 114 of part A of chapter 62 of 2 the laws of 2011, relating to constituting chapter 18-A of the consol- 3 idated laws relating to financial services, as amended by chapter 302 of 4 the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 5 (e) section 205-b of the financial services law as added by section 6 one of this act shall expire October 3, [2026] 2031, when upon such date 7 the provisions of such section shall be deemed repealed; 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15922-01-6